Louisiana, session 2026, HB58.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 312(E) through (H) are hereby
amended and reenacted and Code of Criminal Procedure Article 312(I) is hereby enacted to
read as follows:
Art. 312. Right to bail before and after conviction
* * *
E. After Except as provided in Paragraph H of this Article, after conviction
and before sentence, bail shall be allowed if the maximum sentence which may be
imposed is imprisonment for five years or less. Bail Except as provided in Paragraph
H of this Article, bail may be allowed pending sentence if the maximum sentence
which may be imposed is imprisonment exceeding five years, except when the court
has reason to believe, based on competent evidence, that the release of the person
convicted will pose a danger to any other person or the community, or that there is
a substantial risk that the person convicted might flee.
F. After Except as provided in Paragraph H of this Article, after sentence and
until final judgment, bail shall be allowed if a sentence of five years or less is
actually imposed. Bail Except as provided in Paragraph H of this Article, bail may
be allowed after sentence and until final judgment if the sentence actually imposed
exceeds imprisonment for five years, except when the court has reason to believe,
based on competent evidence, that the release of the person convicted will pose a
danger to any other person or the community, or that there is a substantial risk that
the person convicted might flee.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 58 ENROLLED
G.(1) After conviction of a capital offense, a defendant shall not be allowed
bail.
(2)(a) After conviction of any crime punishable by imprisonment for twenty-
five years or more that is both either a sex offense and as defined in R.S. 15:541 or
a crime of violence as defined in R.S. 14:2(B), there shall be a rebuttable
presumption that the release of the person convicted will pose a danger to another
person or the community and that there is a substantial risk that the person convicted
might flee.
(b) For purposes of this Paragraph:
(i) "Crime of violence" means any offense defined or enumerated as a crime
of violence in R.S. 14:2(B).
(ii) "Sex offense" means any offense that requires registration and
notification pursuant to R.S. 15:540 et seq.
H. After conviction, a defendant shall not be allowed bail for any of the
following offenses:
(1) A capital offense.
(2) Any aggravated offense as defined in R.S. 15:541 that is committed
against a victim who is a minor.
H. I. A person held without bail or unable to post bail may invoke the
supervisory jurisdiction of the court of appeal on a claim that the trial court has
improperly refused bail or a reduction of bail in a bailable case.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.